Hawaii statutes.
[§432G-16] Statutory construction and
relationship to other laws. (a) Except as provided in subsection (c) and
otherwise provided in this chapter, the insurance laws shall not apply to the
activities authorized and regulated under this chapter of any dental insurer
granted a certificate of authority under this chapter.

(b) Solicitation of enrollees by a dental
insurer granted a certificate of authority, or its representatives, shall not
be construed to violate any provision of law relating to solicitation or
advertising by providers.

(c) Articles 2, 2D, 13, and 15 of chapter 431,
and the powers granted by those provisions to the commissioner shall apply to dental
insurers, so long as the application in any particular case is in compliance
with and is not preempted by applicable federal statutes and regulations. [L
2013, c 191, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next